Massachusetts, session 194th, H1935.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subparagraph 1 of paragraph D of section 99 of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2006 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:- g. for
a person not acting under color of law to intercept a wire communication containing a person's
speech or oral communication where such person is a party to the communication or where one
of the parties to the communication has given prior consent to such interception.
of 1